District of Columbia statutes.
51-152

Expired

Unemployment Compensation Study Commission on the Solvency of the District Unemployment Fund.

Expired.

May 7, 1983, D.C. Law 5-3, § 3, 30 DCR 1371

Expiration of Law 5-3

Section 4 of D.C. Law 5-3, as amended by § 4 of D.C. Law 5-124, provided that except for provisions of § 2(a), (b), (d), (f)(2), (g), (h), (j), (1)(3), (m), (n), (o), (p), (q), (r), and (s) of D.C. Law 5-3, D.C. Law 5-3 shall expire on December 31, 1985.

Section 46-102.1 [1981 Ed.,] which derived from § 3 of D.C. Law 5-3, expired December 31, 1985.
2001 Ed., § 51-102.01